Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 10 Public Guardians

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 9/HB 394, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

29-10-1.
“Public guardian” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “public guardian” means an individual or private entity, including a nonprofit entity, who meets the qualifications required in this chapter and has registered with and been duly approved by the probate court to serve as a public guardian of an adult pursuant to Code Section 29-4-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394.

29-10-2.
Oath of guardianship.

When appointed pursuant to subsection (b.1) of Code Section 29-4-3, a public guardian is authorized to take the oath of guardianship before the judge of any probate court of this state. In the event of a public guardian that is a private entity, the employee or agent of such entity who will have direct contact with the ward shall take the oath required by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394.

29-10-3.
Qualifications and requirements; training.

To be eligible to serve as a public guardian, an individual must:

Be at least 18 years of age;

Submit to a criminal background check with satisfactory results as prescribed by the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services;

Submit to an investigation of the individual’s credit history as prescribed by the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services;

Attend and complete at least 20 hours of training approved by the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services, including but not limited to training conducted by such division, a professional association, or by the probate court;

Demonstrate competency, education, and experience in guardianships, social work, or case management; and fiduciary integrity to perform the duties of a public guardian;

Demonstrate competency and ability to carry out the values of the ward; and

Agree to abide by the provisions of this chapter and to serve when appointed as public guardian without the ability to decline, except as provided for in Chapter 4 of this title.

To be eligible to serve as a public guardian, an entity must:

Maintain an appropriate level of liability insurance covering all employees and agents who will have direct contact with a ward in an amount or amounts approved by the probate court;

Maintain a record for each employee and agent who will have direct contact with a ward and ensure that each such employee and agent submits to and meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section;

Submit to an investigation of the entity’s financial records; and

Agree to abide by the provisions of this chapter and to serve when appointed as public guardian without the ability to decline, except as provided for in Chapter 4 of this title.

An individual or entity shall submit all required documentation as specified by the probate court to show that such individual or entity and such entity’s employees and agents meet the requirements of this Code section.

After completion of the initial training, a public guardian or employee or agent of a public guardian who will have direct contact with a ward, if an entity, must complete at least 20 additional hours of training every two years. The initial and subsequent training shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in:

Basic principles of guardianship;

Rights of the ward;

Alternatives to guardianship;

Court procedures;

Legal duties, responsibilities, and roles of guardians;

Fiduciary responsibilities, record keeping, reporting, administrative duties, intake process, and planning;

Availability of resources, public benefits, and social services;

Health care and end-of-life planning;

Mental, developmental, and physical disabilities;

Communications;

Case management; and

Property management.

Any costs incurred by a public guardian to comply with these requirements shall be at the expense of the individual or private entity and shall not be paid with the assets of any ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

29-10-4.
Registration with the probate court; registration lists.

An individual who meets the requirements of Code Section 29-10-3 may be registered as a public guardian in the probate court of the county in which he or she is domiciled upon approval by the probate court. Such individual may also be registered in the probate court of other counties within a reasonable distance of the county in which he or she is domiciled as approved by such other probate courts.

A private entity that meets the requirements of Code Section 29-10-3 may be registered as a public guardian in the probate court of any county upon approval by such probate court.

The probate court of a county shall have the sole discretion regarding the approval and registration of public guardians. Each probate court shall maintain a list of public guardians who have been registered and approved in its county. The Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services shall maintain a master list of registered public guardians throughout the state; and the probate courts shall submit, on January 1 and July 1 of each year or more often as required by the division, the list of registered public guardians in each county to the Division of Aging Services.

The Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services shall develop a standard form that may be used by probate courts in registering public guardians.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

29-10-5.
Bond.

A public guardian shall give bond with good security, to be judged by the court, in a sum of not less than $10,000.00. The bond shall be payable to the court for the benefit of all concerned. It shall be attested by the judge or clerk of the court and shall be conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the public guardian’s duty as such, as required by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 21/SB 534.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

29-10-6.
Letters of guardianship.

The court shall grant to the public guardian separate letters of guardianship upon each appointment. The public guardian shall be subject to all liabilities and entitled to all the rights and emoluments provided for other guardians and shall be governed by the law provided for other guardians.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394.

29-10-7.
Record keeping and reporting; required visits to ward; limitations on number of wards; cooperation with county guardians and conservators.

A public guardian shall keep and maintain proper financial, case control, and statistical records on all matters in which the public guardian serves as guardian.

No report or disclosure of the ward’s personal or medical records shall be made except as required or authorized by law.

A public guardian shall file an annual report with the probate court on the operations of the public guardian for the preceding year, in writing, by August 1.

Within six months of appointment as a public guardian, such public guardian shall submit to the probate court for placement in the ward’s guardianship file a report on the public guardian’s efforts to locate a family member or friend or other individual included in subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-3 to act as the guardian of the ward and a report on the ward’s potential to be restored to capacity.

The public guardian or employee or agent of a public guardian, if a private entity, shall visit the ward at least four times per year and more often as necessary.

A public guardian who is an individual shall serve no more than five wards at any one time. A public guardian that is an entity shall serve no more than 30 wards at any one time. In the discretion of the probate court, these maximum ratios may be increased or decreased for a particular public guardian, in light of all relevant circumstances.

Public guardians, county guardians, and conservators shall be required to work cooperatively together when appointed for the same ward.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394.

29-10-8.
Additional security on the bond or additional bond.

The probate court may require a public guardian to give additional security on the bond or to give an additional bond with security. The court shall have the authority to fix the amount of the bond and shall cite the public guardian to appear and show cause, if any, why the additional bond or security should not be given.

If upon the hearing the public guardian fails to show good cause why the additional bond or additional security should not be given, the court shall issue an order fixing the amount of the bond and direct the public guardian to give additional security on or before a certain date, which date shall be within 30 days of the date of the order.

Should the public guardian fail, refuse, or neglect to give additional bond or additional security on or before the date fixed in the order of the court and fail to show good cause why further time should be allowed, it shall be the duty of the court to remove the public guardian and to appoint another public guardian for the unexpired term of office. The order of removal shall be recorded as provided for the order of appointment.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394.

29-10-9.
Revocation of letters of guardianship.

The court may, for good cause shown, revoke the letters of guardianship of the public guardian, require additional security on the public guardian’s bond, or issue any other order as is expedient and necessary for the good of any particular guardianship in the hands of the public guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394.

29-10-10.
Compensation.

Public guardians shall receive compensation for their services in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4 of this title. However, for wards who have insufficient resources or income to pay the compensation provided for in Chapter 4 of this title, at the discretion of the probate court judge, a request for payment for the public guardian to the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services, as provided for in Code Section 29-10-11, shall be made. A public guardian shall be paid the compensation provided for in Chapter 4 of this title pursuant to Code Section 29-10-11 to the extent that the available funds can meet that expense or, at the discretion of the judge, the public guardian’s actual expenses may be reimbursed from the funds pursuant to Code Section 29-10-11.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

29-10-11.
Appropriation of funds for compensation in certain circumstances.

The General Assembly is authorized to appropriate state funds, by line item appropriation, for the purpose of providing compensation to public guardians for services to wards who have insufficient resources or income to pay the compensation provided for in Chapter 4 of this title.

Any such funds appropriated shall be administered by the Division of Aging Services of the Department of Human Services and paid, if funds are available, upon submission of appropriate documentation by the probate court pursuant to Code Section 29-10-10.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-10-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 509, § 5/HB 394; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.